District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.05

Establishment of Board of Directors.

(a)

(1)

The Authority shall be governed by a Board of Directors (“Board”), which shall be comprised of 12 members, including the 9 members appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection (“public Board members”) and the following individuals, each of whom shall serve as an ex-officio voting member:

(A)

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia;

(B)

The President of the Hotel Association of Washington, D.C.; and

(C)

An individual designated by the Mayor.

(2)

The 9 public Board members shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council by resolution, in accordance with § 1-523.01.

(3)

Of the 9 public Board members, 1 shall be from the hotel industry, 1 shall be from the restaurant industry, 1 shall be from organized labor, and the remaining 6 shall have proven expertise in municipal finance, business finance, economic development, construction, sports, entertainment, or tourism.

(4)

The members of the Board of Directors of the Washington Convention Center Authority serving on March 3, 2010, shall become members of the Board of Directors of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority and shall serve the remainder of their terms and may be reappointed to full terms as members of the Board of Directors of the Washington Convention and Sports Authority.

(5)

Repealed.

(b)

(1)

All public Board terms shall be 4-year terms.

(2)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Any person appointed to fill a vacancy on the Board shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of the Board member whose vacancy is being filled. If any Board member is appointed to fill an unexpired term with more than 2 years remaining in the term, upon expiration of the term, that Board member shall be deemed to have served a full 4-year term.

(e)

The Mayor shall appoint a chairperson of the Board from among the 9 public Board members with the advice and consent of the Council by resolution.

(f)

Repealed.

(g)

Each public Board member shall be a resident of the District or establish residency not later than 6 months after appointment to the Board. The Mayor shall remove any Board member for failure to establish or maintain residency or for misconduct or neglect of duty (as defined by the Board in its by-laws) after notice to the Board member.

(h)

Should a Board member be indicted for the commission of a felony, the Board member shall be automatically suspended from serving on the Board. Upon a final determination of guilt or innocence, the term of the Board member shall, respectively, be automatically terminated or reinstated.

(i)

The Board shall meet no less than once every 60 days and shall be subject to the provisions of § 1-207.42.

(j)

Seven Board members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and an affirmative vote of a majority shall be necessary for any valid Board action. For purposes of issuing bonds, and adopting budgets and financial plans, the Chief Financial Officer of the District with respect to the issuance of bonds and the adoption of budgets and financial plans, shall be a member of the majority. No vacancy in membership, except a vacancy of the Chief Financial Officer of the District, shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the Board.

(k)

Board members shall serve without compensation, except that Board members may be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in official duties of the Board.

(l)

The powers of the Board shall not be limited by any articles of incorporation or by-laws adopted by the Interim Board established pursuant to § 10-1202.17.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 205, 41 DCR 5333
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 2(c), 45 DCR 4826
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-184, § 2, 49 DCR 6059
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 16, 49 DCR 8140
Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-112, § 2, 51 DCR 1348
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(g), 57 DCR 181
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7212(a), 60 DCR 12472
July 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-15, § 2(a), 62 DCR 6872

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-806.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-184, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “terms, and no” for “terms. No”, and inserted “; provided, the term of a public Board member who is serving in his or her second consecutive term on May 15, 2001, shall terminate on December 31, 2003” before the final period.
D.C. Law 14-213, in subsec. (a)(2), substituted “resolution, in accordance with § 1-523.01” for “resolution”.
D.C. Law 15-112, in subsec. (b)(1), deleted “, and no Board member shall serve more than 2 consecutive terms” following “4 year terms”.
D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote subsecs. (a), (j), and (k); and, in subsec. (e), substituted “9” for “7”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 repealed (f).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-15 rewrote (a)(1); repealed (a)(5); rewrote (b)(1); substituted “public Board member” for “Board member” in (g); and substituted “Seven Board members for “Six Board members” in (j).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Oversight and Management Continuity Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-90, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2995).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Oversight and Management Continuity Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-119, May 2, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4394).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Term Limit Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-92, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3612).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Oversight and Management Continuity Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-189, November 29, 2001, 48 DCR 11216).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Oversight and Management Continuity Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-228, January 14, 2002, 49 DCR 690).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Oversight and Management Continuity Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-344, April 24, 2002, 49 DCR 4298).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Washington Convention Center Authority Term Limit Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-224, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10703).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(g) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2081(g) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7212(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7212(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Events DC Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-60, May 8, 2015, 62 DCR 8022, 21 DCSTAT 1438).

Effective Dates

For effective date of D.C. Law 12-142, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-1202.01.

Short Title

Section 7211 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle U of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Destination DC Technical Clarification Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.